Nebraska, session 109, LB993.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB993 LB993
2026 2026
Section 1. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The protection of constitutional rights is essential to
maintaining public trust in law enforcement;
(2) The judicial doctrine of qualified immunity has, in practice,
denied many Nebraskans a remedy for violations of their state and federal
constitutional rights;
(3) The State of Nebraska has a compelling interest in ensuring that
all persons within its jurisdiction have access to justice and
accountability when their rights are violated by government actors; and
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to create an independent,
state-based civil remedy for deprivation of constitutional rights and to
eliminate qualified immunity as a defense to such claims.
Sec. 2. For purposes of sections 1 to 6 of this act:
(1) Constitutional right means any right, privilege, or immunity
guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution
of Nebraska;
(2) Law enforcement officer means:
(a) A law enforcement officer as defined in section 81-1401;
(b) A peace officer as defined in section 49-801;
(c) A correctional officer; or
(d) A probation officer;
(3)(a) Public employer means the state, any state agency, or any
political subdivision.
(b) Public employer does not include a contractor of the state, a
state agency, or a political subdivision;
(4) Political subdivision has the same meaning as in section 13-903;
and
(5) State agency has the same meaning as in section 81-8,210.
Sec. 3. (1) A person who has been deprived of any constitutional
right by a law enforcement officer acting under color of law may bring a
civil action for appropriate relief.
-2-

LB993 LB993
2026 2026
(2) In an action under this section, appropriate relief includes:
(a) Compensatory damages, including for physical injury, pain and
suffering, emotional distress, loss of liberty, or loss of reputation;
(b) Punitive damages when the officer's conduct is determined to be
willful, wanton, or malicious;
(c) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as
may be appropriate; and
(d) Reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably
incurred.
(3) In any action brought under this section, qualified immunity or
any substantially similar defense shall not be available to the
defendant.
(4) Any punitive damages awarded under this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(5) The cause of action provided for in this section is independent
of and in addition to any other remedy provided by state or federal law.
Sec. 4. (1) A public employer shall indemnify its law enforcement
officers for any judgment entered against them in an action under section
3 of this act, unless the officer acted in bad faith or with malicious
intent.
(2) If the public employer determines that indemnification is not
required under subsection (1) of this section, it shall provide written
notice to the officer and the plaintiff within thirty days after the
entry of judgment.
Sec. 5. An action brought under section 3 of this act shall be
filed within three years after the cause of action accrues.
Sec. 6. (1) Sovereign immunity is waived for any claim brought
pursuant to section 3 of this act.
(2) A claim under section 3 of this act is not subject to the
Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act or the State Tort Claims Act.
-3-

LB993 LB993
2026 2026
Sec. 7. Section 13-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-903 For purposes of the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act
and sections 16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Political subdivision includes shall include villages, cities of
all classes, counties, school districts, learning communities, public
power districts, and all other units of local government, including
entities created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint
Public Agency Act. Political subdivision shall not be construed to
include any contractor with a political subdivision;
(2) Governing body means shall mean the village board of a village,
the city council of a city, the board of commissioners or board of
supervisors of a county, the board of directors of a public power
district, the governing board or other governing body of an entity
created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint Public Agency
Act, and any duly elected or appointed body holding the power and
authority to determine the appropriations and expenditures of any other
unit of local government;
(3) Employee of a political subdivision means shall mean any one or
more officers or employees of the political subdivision or any agency of
the subdivision and shall include members of the governing body, duly
appointed members of boards or commissions when they are acting in their
official capacity, volunteer firefighters, and volunteer rescue squad
personnel. Employee shall not be construed to include any contractor with
a political subdivision; and
(4)(a) (4) Tort claim means shall mean any claim against a political
subdivision for money only on account of damage to or loss of property or
on account of personal injury or death, caused by the negligent or
wrongful act or omission of any employee of the political subdivision,
while acting within the scope of his or her office or employment, under
-4-

LB993 LB993
2026 2026
circumstances in which the political subdivision, if a private person,
would be liable to the claimant for such damage, loss, injury, or death
but shall not include any claim accruing before January 1, 1970.
(b) Tort claim does not include an action against a law enforcement
officer under section 3 of this act.
Sec. 8. Section 81-8,210, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,210 For purposes of the State Tort Claims Act:
(1) State agency includes all departments, agencies, boards,
bureaus, and commissions of the State of Nebraska and corporations the
primary function of which is to act as, and while acting as,
instrumentalities or agencies of the State of Nebraska but shall not
include corporations that are essentially private corporations or
entities created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint
Public Agency Act. State agency does not include any contractor with the
State of Nebraska;
(2) State Claims Board means the board created by section 81-8,220;
(3) Employee of the state means any one or more officers or
employees of the state or any state agency and shall include duly
appointed members of boards or commissions when they are acting in their
official capacity. State employee does not include any employee of an
entity created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint
Public Agency Act or any contractor with the State of Nebraska;
(4)(a) (4) Tort claim means any claim against the State of Nebraska
for money only on account of damage to or loss of property or on account
of personal injury or death caused by the negligent or wrongful act or
omission of any employee of the state, while acting within the scope of
his or her office or employment, under circumstances in which the state,
if a private person, would be liable to the claimant for such damage,
loss, injury, or death but does not include any claim accruing before
January 1, 1970, any claim against an employee of the state for money
-5-

LB993 LB993
2026 2026
only on account of damage to or loss of property or on account of
personal injury or death caused by the negligent or wrongful act or
omission of the employee while acting within the scope of his or her
employment occurring on or after August 25, 1989, and any claim allowed
under the Nebraska Claims for Wrongful Conviction and Imprisonment Act. ;
(b) Tort claim does not include an action against a law enforcement
officer under section 3 of this act;
(5) Award means any amount determined by the Risk Manager or State
Claims Board to be payable to a claimant under section 81-8,211 or the
amount of any compromise or settlement under section 81-8,218; and
(6) Risk Manager means the Risk Manager appointed under section
81-8,239.01.
Sec. 9. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 10. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 11. Original sections 13-903 and 81-8,210, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-